Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-601
City, defined.

The term city as used in sections 19-601 to 19-648 includes any city having a population of one thousand or more and less than two hundred thousand.

Laws 1917, c. 208, § 1, p. 497;

C.S.1922, § 4538;

C.S.1929, § 19-601;

R.S.1943, § 19-601;

Laws 1955, c. 55, § 4, p. 180;

Laws 1963, c. 89, § 2, p. 300;

Laws 1985, LB 372, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 893, § 1.

The sections in this article relate to cities operating under the city manager plan. State ex rel. Warren v. Kleman, 178 Neb. 564, 134 N.W.2d 254 (1965).